Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,133
Partial ouster, judgment of.

If the defendant is found to have exercised merely certain individual powers and privileges to which he was not entitled, the judgment shall be the same as above directed, but only in relation to those particulars in which he is thus exceeding the lawful exercise of his rights and privileges.

R.S.1867, Code § 716, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8340;

C.S.1922, § 9292;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,124;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,133.